South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S101.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-80-10(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) For purposes of this chapter: (1) "Employer" means any fire department or other entity which puts an individual or employee in service as a firefighter or assigns any person to work or to official duties as a firefighter whether or not the firefighter receives financial compensation. (2) "Employment date" means the date the fire chief certifies the firefighter has been added to the fire department's roster as a recruit or is trained and prepared to perform firefighting duties. (3) "Fire chief" means the highest ranking officer or official in charge of a fire department, whether or not called by some other title. (4) "Fire department" means any organization providing rescue, fire suppression, and related activities including any public or government sponsored organizations engaged in rescue, fire suppression, and related activities.any legally organized fire department or fire service in this State that: (a) engages in fire suppression and other related fire service activities; (b) provides fire protection to a dedicated response district, other than their own property, and must be officially recognized, created or chartered by a town, municipality, county, or the state; (c) has a Public Protection Classification (PPC) rating through the Insurance Services Office (ISO). This rating may be as an individual department or in conjunction with neighboring districts; (d) is dispatched by a 911 dispatch center or a local government-owned Public Safety Answering Point (PSAP). Effective no later than July 1, 2026, the fire department must be verified by the State Fire Marshal's Office and issued a valid South Carolina Fire Department (SCFD) number and is eligible for a National Emergency Response Information System (NERIS) number; and (e) is registered and maintains a roster of its members with both the State Fire Marshal and the South Carolina State Firefighters' Association. (5) "Firefighter" means any person, male or female, paid or unpaid, who engages in rescue, fire suppression, or related activities under the supervision of a fire chief or fire department. (6) "Firefighting duties" means duties relating to rescue, fire suppression, public safety, and related activities as assigned by a fire chief. SECTION 2.  Section 40-80-40(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) A firefighter who works for or serves more than one fire department must be registered by each fire department. SECTION 3.  Section 40-80-50 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 40-80-50.  Upon recommendation of a fire chief or other employer, the Office of the State Fire Marshal must register each firefighter subject to the provisions of Sections 40-80-30 and 40-80-40. The Office of the State Fire Marshal must maintain as minimum information on each firefighter the complete name, the date of birth, the social security number, a valid  the South Carolina driver's license number, the employer, and the date of employment or membership. The Office of the State Fire Marshal must notify the chief of the employing fire department or other employer of the registration. This notification may be transmitted electronically or in written form. The fire chief must utilize forms as required and provided by the Office of the State Fire Marshal. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----